Delaware, session 153, HB152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 907B, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 907B. Criminal impersonation of a police officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician (EMT), paramedic or fire police; law-enforcement official; class E felony, class C felony. (a) A person is guilty of criminal impersonation of a police officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician (EMT), paramedic or fire police law-enforcement official when the person, intending to facilitate the commission of a crime or while in immediate flight therefrom: therefrom does either of the following: (1) Intentionally and without lawful authority impersonates or otherwise pretends to be a police officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician (EMT), paramedic or fire police; or law-enforcement official. (2) Without lawful authority does any act intended to create or reinforce a false impression that the person is a police officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician (EMT), paramedic or fire police. law-enforcement official. (b) Criminal impersonation of a police officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician (EMT), paramedic or fire police law-enforcement official is a class E felony, unless during the course of the commission of the crime, or while in immediate flight therefrom, the person or another participant in the crime: crime does either of the following, in which case it is a class C felony: (1) Causes physical injury to any person who is not a participant in the crime; or crime. (2) Commits a class A felony or class B felony as defined by this title or any sexual offense as defined by Â§â761(i) of this title, in which case it is a class C felony. title. (c) Nothing in this section shall preclude precludes a separate charge, conviction conviction, or sentence for any other crime. (d) For purposes of this section: (1) âFederal officerâ means an officer or agent of the federal government who has the power to make arrests under federal law. (2) âLaw-enforcement officialâ means a police officer, firefighter, emergency medical technician (EMT), paramedic, fire police, or federal officer.